New York, session 2025-2026, S2536.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 220 of the labor law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph (f) to read as follows: 3 (f) (i) For the purposes of this subdivision contractors or subcon- 4 tractors engaged in custom fabrication shall not be regarded as material 5 suppliers. For the purposes of this subdivision, a legal day's work for 6 which the prevailing rate of wages for the New York county in which the 7 public works project is situated shall be paid to laborers, workers and 8 mechanics shall include custom fabrication regardless of whether the 9 custom fabrication occurs on-site, off-site, or in another jurisdiction 10 outside the state where the custom fabrication constitutes a significant 11 portion of the building or work, it shall be a condition of the contract 12 concerning all such custom fabrication work that the contractor or 13 employer awarded the public work contract, except where the project 14 includes federal funding that triggers federal rules for wage require- 15 ments, and any subcontractor thereto shall pay the on-site prevailing 16 wage required for workers at the site of the public work project to 17 those workers performing the custom fabrication. To perform a public 18 works contract each contractor or subcontractor who employs workers EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00331-02-5 S. 2536--A 2 1 off-site for the custom fabrication work related to a public work 2 project shall maintain certified payrolls for those workers and provide 3 such payrolls, with original certifications, to the department at least 4 annually and upon request, and shall comply with section two hundred 5 twenty-i of this article, as applicable. For the purposes of this 6 subdivision the term "custom fabrication" shall include, but not be 7 limited to, the fabrication of exterior or interior wall panel systems, 8 woodwork, electrical, plumbing, heating, cooling, ventilation or exhaust 9 duct systems, rebar cages, and mechanical insulation solely and specif- 10 ically designed and engineered for installation in the construction, 11 repair or renovation of a building which is the subject of a contract to 12 which the state, a department of the state, a board or officer in the 13 state, a municipal corporation, a public benefit corporation or a 14 commission appointed pursuant to law is a party. For the purposes of 15 this subdivision, a "significant portion of building or work" means that 16 portions or modules of the building or work, as opposed to smaller 17 prefabricated components, are delivered to the place where the building 18 or work will remain, with minimal construction work remaining other than 19 the installation and/or assembly of the portions or modules. 20 (ii) The department of jurisdiction, as defined in subdivision three-a 21 of this section and including any entity to whom such department of 22 jurisdiction delegates their authority, shall be required to report to 23 the fiscal officer the intention to contract for custom, off-site fabri- 24 cation of any materials on all contracts, regardless of the amount, 25 which may include the employment of laborers, workers or mechanics in 26 the application to the fiscal officer for the approval of such contract. 27 The department of jurisdiction's report shall state the name and address 28 of the off-site, custom fabricator, identify the custom materials that 29 are being fabricated off-site and the quantity thereof, the estimated 30 and actual cost of the off-site fabrication, and the estimated number of 31 workers employed to complete the custom fabrication at the off-site 32 location. 33 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 34 it shall have become a law and shall apply only to those contracts put 35 out to bid on or after such effective date. Effective immediately, the 36 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 37 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 38 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.